Massachusetts, session 194th, H4754.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 5I of chapter 59 or any other general or special law
to the contrary, with respect to real property in the Town of Auburn the following factors
determining exemption for real property under section 5I of chapter 59 shall be adjusted as
follows: (1) increasing the amount contained in the sixth sentence from ten to twenty-five; and
(2) increasing the amount contained in the eighth sentence from one million to five million.
SECTION 2. The Select Board for the Town of Auburn may provide an exemption for
parcels with multiple commercial occupants if at least 50 percent of the occupants are eligible
businesses.
SECTION 3. The provisions of this act are severable and if any provision, or portion
thereof, should be held to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid by any court of competent
jurisdiction, such unconstitutionality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions,
which remain in full force and effect.
of 2

SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2